Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF84.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 1783YH (4) 91 as/js H.F. 84 Section 1. Section 124.414, subsection 3, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 3. A person who violates this section commits a simple 3 misdemeanor punishable as a scheduled violation under section 4 805.8C . 5 Sec. 2. Section 124.414, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 6 following new subsection: 7 NEW SUBSECTION . 4. Notwithstanding any other provision of 8 law, a violation of this section shall not be used to enhance 9 any other controlled substance violation under this chapter. 10 Sec. 3. Section 805.8C, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 11 following new subsection: 12 NEW SUBSECTION . 3A. Drug paraphernalia violations. For 13 violations of section 124.414, the scheduled fine is two 14 hundred sixty dollars. 15